District of Columbia statutes.
3-3616

Repealed

Administration of chapter.

Repealed.

Aug. 30, 1964, 78 Stat. 632, Pub. L. 88-503, § 16
Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 3205(f), 25 DCR 5740
June 14, 1980, D.C. Law 3-70, § 7(a), 27 DCR 1776
Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-133, § 2(f), 27 DCR 4417
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(a)(3), 44 DCR 1730
Oct. 26, 2000, D.C. Law 13-203, § 804(a), 47 DCR 7837
1981 Ed., § 2-2616.
1973 Ed., § 2-2415.